Hawaii statutes.
§11-15 Application to register. (a) [Subsection
effective until December 31, 2017. For subsection effective January 1, 2018,
see below.] Any person qualified to and desiring to register as a voter in
any county shall make and subscribe to an application in the form of an
affidavit.

The affidavit shall contain the following
information:

(1) Name;

(2) Social security number;

(3) Date of birth;

(4) Residence, including mailing address;

(5) That the residence stated in the affidavit is not
simply because of the person's presence in the State, but that the residence
was acquired with the intent to make Hawaii the person's legal residence with
all the accompanying obligations therein; and

(6) That the person is a citizen.

An application to register to vote shall
include a space to request a permanent absentee ballot.

(a) [Subsection effective January 1, 2018.
For subsection effective until December 31, 2017, see above.] Any person
qualified to and desiring to register as a voter in any county shall make and
subscribe to an application in the form of an affidavit.

The affidavit shall contain the following
information:

(1) Name;

(2) The applicant's
Hawaii driver's license number or Hawaii state identification card number;
provided that:

(A) If no driver's license or identification
card has been issued to the applicant, the last four digits of the applicant's
social security number; and

(B) If no social security number has been
issued to the applicant, an election official or county clerk shall assign the
applicant a unique identification number for voter registration purposes and
enroll the applicant in the State's computerized voter registration list, if
any;

(3) Date of birth;

(4) Residence, including mailing address;

(5) That the residence stated in the affidavit is not
simply because of the person's presence in the State, but that the residence
was acquired with the intent to make Hawaii the person's legal residence with
all the accompanying obligations therein; and

(6) That the person is a citizen.

An application to register to vote shall
include a space to request a permanent absentee ballot.

(b) The applicant shall swear to the truth of
the allegations by self-subscribing affirmation in the affidavit on application
for voter registration or other form prescribed by the chief election officer.
Unless contested by a qualified voter, the clerk may accept, as prima facie
evidence, the allegation of the applicant in information required in the
affidavit in subsection (a)(5). In any other case where the clerk shall so
desire or believe the same to be expedient, the clerk may demand that the
applicant furnish substantiating evidence to the allegations of the applicant's
application.

(c) The applicant shall then affix the
applicant's signature to the affidavit. In the case where an applicant is
unable to write for the reason of illiteracy, blindness, or other physical
disability, the applicant's mark shall be witnessed by another person who shall
sign the affidavit in the space provided. A voter having once been registered
shall not be required to register again for any succeeding election, except as
provided in this chapter. Affidavits approved by the clerk shall thereupon be
numbered appropriately, filed by the clerk, and kept available for election or
government purposes in accordance with procedures established by section
11-97. Approved voter registration transactions conducted through the online
voter registration system established pursuant to section 11-15.3 shall be
assigned a transaction number in a manner that is substantially similar to the
numbering of affidavits.

(d) The clerk may designate a subordinate or
subordinates to act in the clerk's place in all matters covered by this
section, except that no candidate shall be eligible to serve as a subordinate.
[L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(f); am L 1974, c 34, §1(a); am L
1976, c 106, §1(4); am L 1979, c 196, §4; am L 1981, c 107, §1 and c 195, §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 111, §1; am L 1990, c 45, §§2, 3 and c 156, §6; am L
1998, c 23, §2; am L 2011, c 142, §1; am L 2012, c 225, §3; am L 2016, c 167,
§2]

Note

L 2011, c 142, §4 provides:

"SECTION 4. The office of elections shall continue to
use its existing voter registration application forms where possible until such
time as new forms are developed and printed by the office of elections to
implement this Act [amending this section and sections 11-16 and 15-4]."

Attorney General Opinions

Clerk may deputize seventeen-year olds as voter registrars,
there being no statute imposing age requirement. Att. Gen. Op. 72‑2.

Case Notes

Indictment of section dismissed because did not allege
challenge by a qualified voter or that defendant had information contrary to
that contained in voter registration affidavits. 67 H. 398, 688 P.2d 1152.

Preclearance under Voting Rights Act not prerequisite for
enforcement of this section. 68 H. 516, 722 P.2d 453.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next